Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.01.070

Definitions—Change of plan or classification of municipal government.

Where used in this title with reference to procedures established by this title in regard to a change of plan or classification of government, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Classify" means a change from a city of the first or second class, an unclassified city, or a town, to a code city.

(2) "Classification" means either that portion of the general law under which a city or a town operates under Title 35 RCW as a first or second-class city, unclassified city, or town, or otherwise as a code city.

(3) "Organize" means to provide for officers after becoming a code city, under the same general plan of government under which the city operated prior to becoming a code city, pursuant to RCW 35A.02.055.

(4) "Organization" means the general plan of government under which a city operates.

(5) "Plan of government" means a mayor-council form of government under chapter 35A.12 RCW, council-manager form of government under chapter 35A.13 RCW, or a mayor-council, council-manager, or commission form of government in general that is retained by a noncharter code city as provided in RCW 35A.02.130, without regard to variations in the number of elective offices or whether officers are elective or appointive.

(6) "Reclassify" means changing from a code city to the classification, if any, held by such a city immediately prior to becoming a code city.

(7) "Reclassification" means changing from city or town operating under Title 35 RCW to a city operating under Title 35A RCW, or vice versa; a change in classification.

(8) "Reorganize" means changing the plan of government under which a city or town operates to a different general plan of government. A city or town shall not be deemed to have reorganized simply by increasing or decreasing the number of members of its legislative body.

(9) "Reorganization" means a change in general plan of government under which a city operates, but an increase or decrease in the number of members of its legislative body shall not be deemed to constitute a reorganization.

[ 2001 c 33 s 1. Prior: 1994 c 223 s 24; 1994 c 81 s 66; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 36.]